Ohio, session 136, HB365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 5747.08 and 5747.98 be amended 8
and section 5747.87 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as 9
follows: 10
Sec. 5747.08. An annual return with respect to the tax 11
imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and each tax 12
imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code shall be made by 13
every taxpayer for any taxable year for which the taxpayer is 14
liable for the tax imposed by that section or under that 15
chapter, unless the total credits allowed under division (E) of 16
section 5747.05 and divisions (F) and (G) of section 5747.055 of 17
the Revised Code for the year are equal to or exceed the tax 18

H. B. No. 365 Page 2
As Introduced
imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, in which case no 19
return shall be required unless the taxpayer is liable for a tax 20
imposed pursuant to Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. 21
(A) If an individual is deceased, any return or notice 22
required of that individual under this chapter shall be made and 23
filed by that decedent's executor, administrator, or other 24
person charged with the property of that decedent. 25
(B) If an individual is unable to make a return or notice 26
required by this chapter, the return or notice required of that 27
individual shall be made and filed by the individual's duly 28
authorized agent, guardian, conservator, fiduciary, or other 29
person charged with the care of the person or property of that 30
individual. 31
(C) Returns or notices required of an estate or a trust 32
shall be made and filed by the fiduciary of the estate or trust. 33
(D)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(1) 34
(b) of this section, any pass-through entity may file a single 35
return on behalf of one or more of the entity's investors other 36
than an investor that is a person subject to the tax imposed 37
under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. The single return 38
shall set forth the name, address, and social security number or 39
other identifying number of each of those pass-through entity 40
investors and shall indicate the distributive share of each of 41
those pass-through entity investor's income taxable in this 42
state in accordance with sections 5747.20 to 5747.231 of the 43
Revised Code. Such pass-through entity investors for whom the 44
pass-through entity elects to file a single return are not 45
entitled to the exemption or credit provided for by sections 46
5747.02 and 5747.022 of the Revised Code; shall calculate the 47
tax before business credits at the highest rate of tax set forth 48

H. B. No. 365 Page 3
As Introduced
in section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for the taxable year for 49
which the return is filed; and are entitled to only their 50
distributive share of the business credits as defined in 51
division (D)(2) of this section. A single check drawn by the 52
pass-through entity shall accompany the return in full payment 53
of the tax due, as shown on the single return, for such 54
investors, other than investors who are persons subject to the 55
tax imposed under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 56
(b)(i) A pass-through entity shall not include in such a 57
single return any investor that is a trust to the extent that 58
any direct or indirect current, future, or contingent 59
beneficiary of the trust is a person subject to the tax imposed 60
under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 61
(ii) A pass-through entity shall not include in such a 62
single return any investor that is itself a pass-through entity 63
to the extent that any direct or indirect investor in the second 64
pass-through entity is a person subject to the tax imposed under 65
section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 66
(c) Except as provided by division (L) of this section, 67
nothing in division (D) of this section precludes the tax 68
commissioner from requiring such investors to file the return 69
and make the payment of taxes and related interest, penalty, and 70
interest penalty required by this section or section 5747.02, 71
5747.09, or 5747.15 of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (D) 72
of this section precludes such an investor from filing the 73
annual return under this section, utilizing the refundable 74
credit equal to the investor's proportionate share of the tax 75
paid by the pass-through entity on behalf of the investor under 76
division (I) of this section, and making the payment of taxes 77
imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. Nothing in 78

H. B. No. 365 Page 4
As Introduced
division (D) of this section shall be construed to provide to 79
such an investor or pass-through entity any additional deduction 80
or credit, other than the credit provided by division (I) of 81
this section, solely on account of the entity's filing a return 82
in accordance with this section. Such a pass-through entity also 83
shall make the filing and payment of estimated taxes on behalf 84
of the pass-through entity investors other than an investor that 85
is a person subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.06 of 86
the Revised Code. 87
(2) For the purposes of this section, "business credits" 88
means the credits listed in section 5747.98 of the Revised Code 89
excluding the following credits: 90
(a) The retirement income credit under division (B) of 91
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 92
(b) The senior citizen credit under division (F) of 93
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 94
(c) The lump sum distribution credit under division (G) of 95
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 96
(d) The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of 97
the Revised Code; 98
(e) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 99
(C) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 100
(f) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 101
(D) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 102
(g) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 103
(E) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 104
(h) The credit for displaced workers who pay for job 105
training under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; 106

H. B. No. 365 Page 5
As Introduced
(i) The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under 107
section 5747.022 of the Revised Code; 108
(j) The joint filing credit under division (E) of section 109
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 110
(k) The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 111
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 112
(l) The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under 113
division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; 114
(m) The earned income tax credit under section 5747.71 of 115
the Revised Code; 116
(n) The lead abatement credit under section 5747.26 of the 117
Revised Code; 118
(o) The credit for education expenses under section 119
5747.72 of the Revised Code; 120
(p) The credit for tuition paid to a nonchartered 121
nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the Revised Code; 122
(q) The credit for property taxes or rent-equivalent taxes 123
paid under section 5747.87 of the Revised Code. 124
(3) The election provided for under division (D) of this 125
section applies only to the taxable year for which the election 126
is made by the pass-through entity. Unless the tax commissioner 127
provides otherwise, this election, once made, is binding and 128
irrevocable for the taxable year for which the election is made. 129
Nothing in this division shall be construed to provide for any 130
deduction or credit that would not be allowable if a nonresident 131
pass-through entity investor were to file an annual return. 132
(4) If a pass-through entity makes the election provided 133

H. B. No. 365 Page 6
As Introduced
for under division (D) of this section, the pass-through entity 134
shall be liable for any additional taxes, interest, interest 135
penalty, or penalties imposed by this chapter if the tax 136
commissioner finds that the single return does not reflect the 137
correct tax due by the pass-through entity investors covered by 138
that return. Nothing in this division shall be construed to 139
limit or alter the liability, if any, imposed on pass-through 140
entity investors for unpaid or underpaid taxes, interest, 141
interest penalty, or penalties as a result of the pass-through 142
entity's making the election provided for under division (D) of 143
this section. For the purposes of division (D) of this section, 144
"correct tax due" means the tax that would have been paid by the 145
pass-through entity had the single return been filed in a manner 146
reflecting the commissioner's findings. Nothing in division (D) 147
of this section shall be construed to make or hold a pass- 148
through entity liable for tax attributable to a pass-through 149
entity investor's income from a source other than the pass- 150
through entity electing to file the single return. 151
(E) If a husband and wife file a joint federal income tax 152
return for a taxable year, they shall file a joint return under 153
this section for that taxable year, and their liabilities are 154
joint and several, but, if the federal income tax liability of 155
either spouse is determined on a separate federal income tax 156
return, they shall file separate returns under this section. 157
If either spouse is not required to file a federal income 158
tax return and either or both are required to file a return 159
pursuant to this chapter, they may elect to file separate or 160
joint returns, and, pursuant to that election, their liabilities 161
are separate or joint and several. If a husband and wife file 162
separate returns pursuant to this chapter, each must claim the 163
taxpayer's own exemption, but not both, as authorized under 164

H. B. No. 365 Page 7
As Introduced
section 5747.02 of the Revised Code on the taxpayer's own 165
return. 166
(F) Each return or notice required to be filed under this 167
section shall contain the signature of the taxpayer or the 168
taxpayer's duly authorized agent and of the person who prepared 169
the return for the taxpayer, and shall include the taxpayer's 170
social security number. Each return shall be verified by a 171
declaration under the penalties of perjury. The tax commissioner 172
shall prescribe the form that the signature and declaration 173
shall take. 174
(G) Each return or notice required to be filed under this 175
section shall be made and filed as required by section 5747.04 176
of the Revised Code, on or before the fifteenth day of April of 177
each year, on forms that the tax commissioner shall prescribe, 178
together with remittance made payable to the treasurer of state 179
in the combined amount of the state and all school district 180
income taxes shown to be due on the form. 181
Upon good cause shown, the commissioner may extend the 182
period for filing any notice or return required to be filed 183
under this section and may adopt rules relating to extensions. 184
If the extension results in an extension of time for the payment 185
of any state or school district income tax liability with 186
respect to which the return is filed, the taxpayer shall pay at 187
the time the tax liability is paid an amount of interest 188
computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of 189
the Revised Code on that liability from the time that payment is 190
due without extension to the time of actual payment. Except as 191
provided in section 5747.132 of the Revised Code, in addition to 192
all other interest charges and penalties, all taxes imposed 193
under this chapter or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and 194

H. B. No. 365 Page 8
As Introduced
remaining unpaid after they become due, except combined amounts 195
due of one dollar or less, bear interest at the rate per annum 196
prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code until paid or 197
until the day an assessment is issued under section 5747.13 of 198
the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. 199
If the commissioner considers it necessary in order to 200
ensure the payment of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the 201
Revised Code or any tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the 202
Revised Code, the commissioner may require returns and payments 203
to be made otherwise than as provided in this section. 204
To the extent that any provision in this division 205
conflicts with any provision in section 5747.026 of the Revised 206
Code, the provision in that section prevails. 207
(H) The amounts withheld pursuant to section 5747.06, 208
5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.065, or 5747.071 of the 209
Revised Code shall be allowed to the ultimate recipient of the 210
income as credits against payment of the appropriate taxes 211
imposed on the ultimate recipient by section 5747.02 and under 212
Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. As used in this division, 213
"ultimate recipient" means the person who is required to report 214
income from which amounts are withheld pursuant to section 215
5747.06, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.065, or 5747.071 of 216
the Revised Code on the annual return required to be filed under 217
this section. 218
(I) If a pass-through entity elects to file a single 219
return under division (D) of this section and if any investor is 220
required to file the annual return and make the payment of taxes 221
required by this chapter on account of the investor's other 222
income that is not included in a single return filed by a pass- 223
through entity or any other investor elects to file the annual 224

H. B. No. 365 Page 9
As Introduced
return, the investor is entitled to a refundable credit equal to 225
the investor's proportionate share of the tax paid by the pass- 226
through entity on behalf of the investor. The investor shall 227
claim the credit for the investor's taxable year in which or 228
with which ends the taxable year of the pass-through entity. 229
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow any credit 230
provided in this chapter to be claimed more than once. For the 231
purpose of computing any interest, penalty, or interest penalty, 232
the investor shall be deemed to have paid the refundable credit 233
provided by this division on the day that the pass-through 234
entity paid the estimated tax or the tax giving rise to the 235
credit. 236
(J) The tax commissioner shall ensure that each return 237
required to be filed under this section includes a box that the 238
taxpayer may check to authorize a paid tax preparer who prepared 239
the return to communicate with the department of taxation about 240
matters pertaining to the return. The return or instructions 241
accompanying the return shall indicate that by checking the box 242
the taxpayer authorizes the department of taxation to contact 243
the preparer concerning questions that arise during the 244
processing of the return and authorizes the preparer only to 245
provide the department with information that is missing from the 246
return, to contact the department for information about the 247
processing of the return or the status of the taxpayer's refund 248
or payments, and to respond to notices about mathematical 249
errors, offsets, or return preparation that the taxpayer has 250
received from the department and has shown to the preparer. 251
(K) The tax commissioner shall permit individual taxpayers 252
to instruct the department of taxation to cause any refund of 253
overpaid taxes to be deposited directly into a checking account, 254
savings account, or an individual retirement account or 255

H. B. No. 365 Page 10
As Introduced
individual retirement annuity, or preexisting college savings 256
plan or program account offered by the Ohio tuition trust 257
authority under Chapter 3334. of the Revised Code, as designated 258
by the taxpayer, when the taxpayer files the annual return 259
required by this section electronically. 260
(L) If, for the taxable year, a nonresident or trust that 261
is the owner of an electing pass-through entity, as defined in 262
section 5747.38 of the Revised Code, does not have Ohio adjusted 263
gross income or, in the case of a trust, modified Ohio taxable 264
income other than from one or more electing pass-through 265
entities, the nonresident or trust shall not be required to file 266
an annual return under this section. Nothing in this division 267
precludes such an owner from filing the annual return under this 268
section, utilizing the refundable credit under section 5747.39 269
of the Revised Code equal to the owner's proportionate share of 270
the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and 271
paid by the electing pass-through entity, and making the payment 272
of taxes imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. 273
(M) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to administer 274
this section. 275
Sec. 5747.87. (A) As used in this section : 276
(1) "Claim year" means, for individuals required to file 277
an income tax return pursuant to this chapter, the individual's 278
taxable year and, for all other individuals, the calendar year 279
preceding the year in which an application for credit is filed 280
under this section. 281
(2) "Eligible claimant" means an individual who has 282
occupied a homestead as an owner or lessee for at least six 283
months of the claim year and whose total household resources do 284

H. B. No. 365 Page 11
As Introduced
not exceed the threshold described in division (G) of this 285
section. 286
(3) "Gross rent" means the total rent paid during the 287
claim year by a lessee for the right to occupy a homestead 288
pursuant to an arm's length transaction with the property owner 289
or the owner's representative. 290
(4) "Qualifying homestead" means a dwelling, including a 291
manufactured or mobile home or a unit in a multiple-unit 292
dwelling or housing cooperative, that is located in this state, 293
that is not fully exempt from property taxation for the claim 294
year, and that meets one of the following requirements: 295
(a) The dwelling is owned by an individual who occupies 296
the dwelling as a primary residence and the true value of the 297
property, as listed on the tax list for the tax year ending in 298
the individual's claim year, does not exceed the home value 299
limit for that claim year; 300
(b) The dwelling is leased by an individual who occupies 301
the dwelling as a primary residence and the gross rent paid by 302
the lessee during the claim year did not exceed the product 303
obtained by multiplying the rent limit for that claim year by 304
the number of months the lessee occupied the dwelling as a 305
primary residence. 306
(5) "Household" means an individual and the individual's 307
spouse. 308
(6) "Income" means federal adjusted gross income, plus all 309
income excluded or exempt from the computation of federal 310
adjusted gross income, subtracted by all of the following: 311
(a) Up to three hundred dollars of gifts in cash or kind 312
from nongovernmental sources; 313

H. B. No. 365 Page 12
As Introduced
(b) Up to three hundred dollars of lottery, casino gaming, 314
or sports gaming winnings; 315
(c) Benefits provided under the supplemental nutrition 316
assistance program administered by the department of job and 317
family services pursuant to section 5101.54 of the Revised Code; 318
(d) Government payments made to a third party on behalf of 319
an individual; 320
(e) State or municipal tax refunds or tax credits; 321
(f) Any government grant that a property owner must use 322
for the rehabilitation of the owner's homestead; 323
(g) Stipends received by a person who is acting as a 324
foster grandparent under the foster grandparent program 325
authorized pursuant to 42 U.S.C 5011 or as a senior companion 326
pursuant to 42 U.S.C 5013; 327
(h) Amounts deducted from benefits provided under Title II 328
of the Social Security Act or from railroad retirement benefits 329
for premiums paid pursuant to the medicare program established 330
by Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; 331
(i) Contributions by an employer to life, accident, or 332
health insurance plans; 333
(j) Any money received from a low-income customer 334
assistance program, as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised 335
Code; 336
(k) Loan proceeds; 337
(l) Inheritance or life insurance benefits from a spouse; 338
(m) Payments from a long-term care policy made to a 339
nursing home or other care facility; 340

H. B. No. 365 Page 13
As Introduced
(n) Accident or health insurance plan premiums paid by an 341
employer for a plan that covers a member of the household or the 342
member's family; 343
(o) Compensation for wrongful imprisonment. 344
(7) "Property tax due" means the property taxes or 345
manufactured home taxes charged and payable against the 346
homestead for the tax year ending in the eligible claimant's 347
claim year, after any reductions allowed under the Revised Code. 348
"Property tax due" does not include taxes that appeared on the 349
general tax list or manufactured home tax list for any preceding 350
tax year or any penalties, interest, or special assessments. 351
(8) "Rent-equivalent tax paid" means fifteen per cent of 352
gross rent. 353
(9) "Total household resources" means all income received 354
by all individuals of a household in the claim year while 355
members of the household, increased by the following deductions 356
from federal gross income: 357
(a) Any net operating loss; 358
(b) Any net rental or royalty loss; 359
(c) Any carryback or carryforward of a net operating loss. 360
(10) "Home value limit" means the median home value of 361
owner-occupied housing units in the county in this state that 362
has the highest such median home value according to the most 363
recent one-year data published in the American community survey. 364
(11) "Rent limit" means the median gross rent in the 365
county in this state that has the highest such median gross rent 366
according to the most recent one-year data published in the 367
American community survey. 368

H. B. No. 365 Page 14
As Introduced
(12) "American community survey" means the supplementary 369
statistics collected and published annually by the United States 370
census bureau in accordance with 13 U.S.C. 141 and 193. 371
(B) A refundable credit or rebate is allowed to eligible 372
claimants. In the case of eligible claimants required to file an 373
annual return under this chapter for the claim year, a credit is 374
allowed against the claimant's aggregate tax liability under 375
section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. For all other eligible 376
claimants, a rebate may be claimed on the form prescribed by the 377
tax commissioner pursuant to division (E) of this section. 378
Subject to division (C) of this section, the credit or rebate 379
shall equal one of the following: 380
(1) For eligible claimants who own the homestead for which 381
the claim is made, the amount by which the eligible claimant's 382
property tax due exceeds five per cent of the eligible 383
claimant's total household resources for that claim year. 384
(2) For eligible claimants who lease the homestead for 385
which the claim is made, the amount by which the eligible 386
claimant's rent-equivalent tax paid in the claim year exceeds 387
five per cent of the eligible claimant's total household 388
resources for that year. 389
(C) The credit or rebate allowed under this section for a 390
claim year shall not exceed a specified limit based upon the 391
eligible claimant's total household resources. For the first 392
claim year ending on or after the effective date of this 393
section, the limits are as follows: 394
395
1 2
A TOTAL HOUSEHOLD RESOURCES CREDIT OR REBATE LIMIT

H. B. No. 365 Page 15
As Introduced
B $60,000 or less $1,000
C More than $60,000 but not more $800
than $70,000
D More than $70,000 but not more $600
than $80,000
E More than $80,000 but not more $400
than $90,000
F More than $90,000 but not more $200
than $100,000
For each succeeding claim year, these household resources 396
tiers and limits shall be adjusted as provided in division (G) 397
of this section. 398
(D) For eligible claimants required to file an annual 399
return under this chapter for the claim year, the credit shall 400
be claimed in the order required under section 5747.98 of the 401
Revised Code. If the amount of the credit under this section 402
exceeds the aggregate amount of tax otherwise due under section 403
5747.02 of the Revised Code after deduction of all other credits 404
in that order, the taxpayer is entitled to a refund of the 405
excess. 406
(E)(1) The tax commissioner shall prescribe a form on 407
which eligible claimants who are not required to file an annual 408
return under this chapter may apply for the rebate authorized 409
under this section. Except as provided in division (E)(2) of 410
this section, such eligible claimants shall apply for the rebate 411
on that form after the first day of January following the end of 412
the claim year but before the fifteenth day of the fourth month 413

H. B. No. 365 Page 16
As Introduced
following the end of that claim year. 414
(2) An eligible claimant may request an extension of the 415
time to file a rebate application under division (E)(1) of this 416
section, on a form prescribed by the commissioner. Upon receipt 417
of such a request, the commissioner shall extend the due date 418
for filing the application to the fifteenth day of the tenth 419
month after the last day of the claim year. 420
(F)(1) The credit or rebate authorized under this section 421
shall be allowed to only one eligible claimant per homestead. 422
(2) Only the lessee shall claim a credit or rebate with 423
respect to property that is rented or leased as a homestead. 424
(G) For the first claim year ending on or after the 425
effective date of this section, an individual qualifies as an 426
eligible claimant only if the individual's total household 427
resources do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. For each 428
following claim year, the tax commissioner shall adjust this 429
total household resources limit and the household resources 430
tiers and credit or rebate limits described in division (C) of 431
this section by completing the following calculations in 432
September of each year: 433
(1) Determine the percentage increase in the gross 434
domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic 435
analysis of the United States department of commerce from the 436
first day of January of the preceding year to the last day of 437
December of the preceding year; 438
(2) Multiply that percentage increase by the total 439
household resources limit, household resources tiers, and credit 440
or rebate limits for the current year; 441
(3) Add the resulting products to the respective tiers and 442

H. B. No. 365 Page 17
As Introduced
limits for the current year; 443
(4) Round the resulting sums to the nearest multiple of 444
one thousand dollars, in the case of the total household 445
resources limit and tiers, or nearest multiple of ten dollars, 446
in the case of the credit or rebate limits. 447
The adjusted amounts apply to claim years beginning in the 448
calendar year in which the adjustment is made and to claim years 449
beginning in each ensuing calendar year until a calendar year in 450
which a new adjustment is made pursuant to this division. The 451
commissioner shall not make a new adjustment in any calendar 452
year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be 453
less than the amount resulting from the adjustment in the 454
preceding calendar year. 455
(H) If a credit or rebate allowed under this section was 456
based on an amount of property tax due that differs from the 457
actual amount of such taxes paid by the eligible claimant for 458
the tax year ending in that claim year, the eligible claimant 459
shall file an annual return or application under division (E) of 460
this section for the ensuing claim year that reports the 461
difference. The claimant shall adjust the credit or rebate 462
claimed for the ensuing year by the amount of the difference. If 463
the claimant is not eligible for the credit or rebate for the 464
ensuing claim year, the claimant shall pay or may request 465
payment of the difference, as applicable. 466
(I) On or before the first day of November of each year, 467
the tax commissioner shall determine and publish a home value 468
limit and rent limit. The limits shall apply to claim years 469
beginning in the calendar year in which the limits are 470
determined. 471

H. B. No. 365 Page 18
As Introduced
Sec. 5747.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for 472
calculating a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 473
5747.02 of the Revised Code, a taxpayer shall claim any credits 474
to which the taxpayer is entitled in the following order: 475
Either the retirement income credit under division (B) of 476
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum retirement 477
income credits under divisions (C), (D), and (E) of that 478
section; 479
Either the senior citizen credit under division (F) of 480
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum 481
distribution credit under division (G) of that section; 482
The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of the 483
Revised Code; 484
The credit for displaced workers who pay for job training 485
under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; 486
The campaign contribution credit under section 5747.29 of 487
the Revised Code; 488
The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under section 489
5747.022 of the Revised Code; 490
The joint filing credit under division (G)(E) of section 491
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 492
The earned income credit under section 5747.71 of the 493
Revised Code; 494
The nonrefundable credit for education expenses under 495
section 5747.72 of the Revised Code; 496
The nonrefundable credit for donations to scholarship 497
granting organizations under section 5747.73 of the Revised 498

H. B. No. 365 Page 19
As Introduced
Code; 499
The nonrefundable credit for tuition paid to a 500
nonchartered nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the 501
Revised Code; 502
The nonrefundable vocational job credit under section 503
5747.057 of the Revised Code; 504
The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) 505
of section 5747.058 of the Revised Code; 506
The enterprise zone credit under section 5709.66 of the 507
Revised Code; 508
The credit for beginning farmers who participate in a 509
financial management program under division (B) of section 510
5747.77 of the Revised Code; 511
The credit for commercial vehicle operator training 512
expenses under section 5747.82 of the Revised Code; 513
The nonrefundable welcome home Ohio (WHO) program credit 514
under section 122.633 of the Revised Code; 515
The credit for selling or renting agricultural assets to 516
beginning farmers under division (A) of section 5747.77 of the 517
Revised Code; 518
The credit for purchases of qualifying grape production 519
property under section 5747.28 of the Revised Code; 520
The small business investment credit under section 5747.81 521
of the Revised Code; 522
The nonrefundable lead abatement credit under section 523
5747.26 of the Revised Code; 524
The opportunity zone investment credit under section 525

H. B. No. 365 Page 20
As Introduced
5747.86 of the Revised Code; 526
The enterprise zone credits under section 5709.65 of the 527
Revised Code; 528
The research and development credit under section 5747.331 529
of the Revised Code; 530
The credit for rehabilitating a historic building under 531
section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; 532
The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under 533
section 5747.83 of the Revised Code; 534
The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit 535
under section 5747.84 of the Revised Code; 536
The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 537
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 538
The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under 539
division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; 540
The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical 541
production credit under section 5747.66 of the Revised Code; 542
The refundable credit for film and theater capital 543
improvement projects under section 5747.67 of the Revised Code; 544
The refundable jobs creation credit or job retention 545
credit under division (A) of section 5747.058 of the Revised 546
Code; 547
The refundable credit for taxes paid by a qualifying 548
entity granted under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code; 549
The refundable credits for taxes paid by a qualifying 550
pass-through entity granted under division (I) of section 551
5747.08 of the Revised Code; 552

H. B. No. 365 Page 21
As Introduced
The refundable credit under section 5747.80 of the Revised 553
Code for losses on loans made to the Ohio venture capital 554
program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; 555
The refundable credit for rehabilitating a historic 556
building under section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; 557
The refundable credit under section 5747.39 of the Revised 558
Code for taxes levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code 559
paid by an electing pass-through entity; 560
The refundable credit for property taxes or rent- 561
equivalent taxes paid under section 5747.87 of the Revised Code. 562
(B) For any credit, except the refundable credits 563
enumerated in this section and the credit granted under division 564
(H) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, the amount of the 565
credit for a taxable year shall not exceed the taxpayer's 566
aggregate amount of tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised 567
Code, after allowing for any other credit that precedes it in 568
the order required under this section. Any excess amount of a 569
particular credit may be carried forward if authorized under the 570
section creating that credit. Nothing in this chapter shall be 571
construed to allow a taxpayer to claim, directly or indirectly, 572
a credit more than once for a taxable year. 573
Section 2. That existing sections 5747.08 and 5747.98 of 574
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 575
Section 3. The enactment by this act of section 5747.87 of 576
the Revised Code applies to claim years, as defined in that 577
section, as enacted by this act, ending on or after the 578
effective date of that enactment. 579
Section 4. This act shall be known as the Property Tax 580
Refund Act. 581